Nevada, session 83, AB561.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Division of Forestry of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of $20,733,824 for an
unanticipated shortfall related to firefighting costs. This
appropriation is supplemental to that made by section 23 of chapter
209, Statutes of Nevada 2023, at page 1242.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)